New Mexico, session 2026, SB257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 74-4-4.2 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1981 (1st S.S.), Chapter 8, Section 6, as amended) is amended to read: "74-4-4.2. PERMITS--ISSUANCE--DENIAL--MODIFICATION-- SUSPENSION--REVOCATION.-- A. An application for a permit pursuant to the Hazardous Waste Act shall contain information required pursuant to Section 74-4-4.7 NMSA 1978 or to regulations promulgated by the board and shall include: (1) estimates of the composition, quantity and concentration of any hazardous waste identified or listed under Subsection A of Section 74-4-4 NMSA 1978 or combinations of any hazardous waste and other solid waste proposed to be disposed of, treated, transported or stored and the time, frequency or rate at which the waste is proposed to be disposed of, treated, transported or stored; [and] (2) an identification and description of, and other pertinent information about, the site where hazardous waste or the products of treatment of hazardous waste will be disposed of, treated, transported to or stored; and (3) for hazardous waste disposal facilities, information on anticipated hazardous waste streams, disposal capacity for hazardous waste generated in the state and how different waste streams will be managed. B. Hazardous waste permits shall require corrective action for all releases of hazardous waste or constituents from any solid waste management unit at a treatment, storage or disposal facility seeking a permit under this section. C. The department shall provide timely review on all permit applications. Upon a determination by the secretary that the applicant has met the requirements adopted pursuant to Section 74-4-4 NMSA 1978, the secretary may issue a permit or a permit subject to any conditions necessary to protect human health and the environment for the facility. D. The secretary may deny any permit application or modify, suspend or revoke any permit issued pursuant to the Hazardous Waste Act if the applicant or permittee has: (1) knowingly and willfully misrepresented a material fact in the application for a permit; (2) refused to disclose the information required under the provisions of Section 74-4-4.7 NMSA 1978; (3) been convicted in any court, within ten years immediately preceding the date of submission of the permit application, of: (a) a felony or other crime involving moral turpitude; or (b) a crime defined by state or federal statutes as involving or being in restraint of trade, price-fixing, bribery or fraud; (4) exhibited a history of willful disregard for environmental laws of any state or the United States; (5) had any permit revoked or permanently suspended for cause under the environmental laws of any state or the United States; or (6) violated any provision of the Hazardous Waste Act, any regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to that act or any condition of a permit issued under that act. E. In making a finding under Subsection D of this section, the secretary may consider aggravating and mitigating factors. F. If an applicant or permittee whose permit is being considered for denial or revocation, respectively, on any basis provided by Subsection D of this section has submitted an action plan that has been approved in writing by the secretary, and plan approval includes a period of operation under a conditional permit that will allow the applicant or permittee a reasonable opportunity to demonstrate its rehabilitation, the secretary may issue a conditional permit for a reasonable period of time. In approving an action plan intended to demonstrate rehabilitation, the secretary may consider: (1) implementation by the applicant or permittee of formal policies; (2) training programs and management control to minimize and prevent the occurrence of future violations; (3) installation by the applicant or permittee of internal environmental auditing programs; (4) the applicant's release or the permittee's release subsequent to serving a period of incarceration or paying a fine, or both, after conviction of any crime listed in Subsection D of this section; and (5) any other factors the secretary deems relevant. G. Notwithstanding the provisions of Subsection D of this section: (1) a research, development and demonstration permit may be terminated upon the determination by the secretary that termination is necessary to protect human health or the environment; and (2) a permit may be modified at the request of the permittee for just cause as demonstrated by the permittee. H. No ruling shall be made on permit issuance, major modification, suspension or revocation without an opportunity for a public hearing at which all interested persons shall be given a reasonable chance to submit data, views or arguments orally or in writing and to examine witnesses testifying at the hearing; provided, however, that the secretary may, pursuant to Section 74-4-10 NMSA 1978, order the immediate termination of a research development and demonstration permit whenever the secretary determines that termination is necessary to protect human health or the environment and may order the immediate suspension or revocation of a permit for a facility that has been ordered to take corrective action or other response measures for releases of hazardous waste into the environment. I. The secretary shall hold a public hearing on a minor permit modification if the secretary determines that there is significant public interest in the minor modification. J. The board shall provide a schedule of fees for businesses generating hazardous waste, conducting permitted hazardous waste management activities or seeking a permit for the management of hazardous waste, including but not limited to: (1) a hazardous waste business fee applicable to any business engaged in a regulated hazardous waste activity, which shall be an annual flat fee based on the type of activity; (2) a hazardous waste generation fee applicable to any business generating hazardous waste, which shall be based on the quantity of hazardous waste generated annually; however, when any material listed in Paragraph (2) of Subsection K of Section 74-4-3 NMSA 1978 is determined by the board to be subject to regulation under Subtitle C of the federal Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, the board may set a generation fee under this paragraph for that waste based on its volume, toxicity, mobility and economic impact on the regulated entity; (3) a hazardous waste permit application fee, not exceeding the estimated cost of investigating the application and issuing the permit, to be paid at the time the secretary notifies the applicant by certified mail that the application has been deemed administratively complete and a technical review is scheduled; and (4) an annual hazardous waste permit management fee based on and not exceeding the estimated cost of conducting regulatory oversight of permitted activities. K. The department and a business generating hazardous waste, conducting permitted hazardous waste management activities or seeking a permit for the management of hazardous waste may enter into a voluntary fee agreement in addition to and that includes all of the fees required by Subsection J of this section. L. In connection with the operation of hazardous waste disposal facilities, the department shall consider a permittee's capacity to accept and prioritize hazardous waste generated within the state when issuing, renewing or modifying a hazardous waste permit." - 7 -